Nevada, session 83, SB201.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or 3, the
executive board of an association or a unit’s owner who rents or
leases his or her unit shall not and the governing documents of an
association or rental agreement must not prohibit a unit’s owner
or an occupant of a unit from engaging in the display of religious
or cultural items within such physical portion of the common-
interest community as that owner or occupant has a right to
occupy and use exclusively.
2. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Apply to a display of religious or cultural items that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) Has a total size that is greater than 36 by 12 square
inches or that exceeds the size of the door on which or whose
frame on which the display of religious or cultural items is
displayed or affixed;
(2) Has a total size that is greater than 36 by 12 square
inches that is immediately adjacent or affixed to the entry of a
unit;
(3) Threatens the health, safety or welfare of the public;
(4) Hinders the opening or closing of any entry door;
(5) Violates any federal, state or local law;
(6) Promotes discriminatory behavior; or
(7) Contains graphics, language or any display that is
obscene or otherwise illegal.
(b) Preclude an association or a unit’s owner who rents or
leases his or her unit from adopting, and do not preclude the
governing documents of an association or a rental agreement
from setting forth, rules that reasonably restrict the placement and
manner of the display of religious or cultural items by a unit’s
owner or an occupant of a unit.
3. An association or a unit’s owner who is performing or
causing to be performed any maintenance, repair or replacement
of an entry door or doorframe of a unit may:
(a) Remove a display of religious or cultural items on the entry
door or doorframe during the time the work is being performed in
accordance with the provisions of this paragraph. An association
or unit’s owner shall, before temporarily removing a display of
religious or cultural items pursuant to this paragraph, provide
written notice at least 7 days before the work is performed, except
in an emergency, to the affected unit’s owner or occupant of the
unit. If, following receipt of such written notice, the unit’s owner
or occupant consents to the removal of the display of religious or
cultural items or fails, within a reasonable period, to respond to
the written notice, then the association or unit’s owner may
temporarily remove the display of religious or cultural items. The
association or unit’s owner shall store the item or items with
respect and in accordance with the appropriate religious or
cultural practice, tradition or custom and document compliance
with this paragraph. After the work is completed, the association
or unit’s owner shall return the display of religious or cultural
items to the entry door or doorframe within 72 hours after the
work is completed.
(b) Require the unit’s owner or an occupant of the unit to
remove a display of religious or cultural items on the entry door or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
doorframe during the time the work is being performed in
accordance with the provisions of this paragraph. An association
or unit’s owner shall, before requiring a unit’s owner or occupant
of a unit to temporarily remove a display of religious or cultural
items pursuant to this paragraph, provide written notice of at least
7 days before the work is performed, except in an emergency, to
the affected unit’s owner or occupant. After the work is completed,
the unit’s owner or occupant must be permitted to return the
display of religious or cultural items to the entry door or
doorframe within 72 hours after the work is completed.
4. In any action commenced to enforce the provisions of this
section, the prevailing party is entitled to recover reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Display of religious or cultural items” means an item
displayed or affixed in or on a unit because of sincerely held
religious or cultural beliefs, practices or traditions.
(b) “Rental agreement” means an oral or written agreement
between a unit’s owner and another person for the use and
occupancy of a unit.
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or 3, a
landlord or an agent or employee of a landlord shall not, and the
rental agreement must not, prohibit a tenant from engaging in the
display of religious or cultural items on the entry door or
doorframe of the dwelling or otherwise in or on the dwelling.
2. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Apply to a display of religious or cultural items that:
(1) Has a total size that is greater than 36 by 12 square
inches or that exceeds the size of the door on which or whose
frame on which the display of religious or cultural items is
displayed or affixed;
(2) Has a total size that is greater than 36 by 12 square
inches that is immediately adjacent or affixed to the entry of a
dwelling;
(3) Threatens the health, safety or welfare of the public;
(4) Hinders the opening or closing of any entry door;
(5) Violates any federal, state or local law;
(6) Promotes discriminatory behavior; or
(7) Contains graphics, language or any display that is
obscene or otherwise illegal.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Preclude a landlord or an agent or employee of a landlord
from adopting policies that reasonably restrict the placement and
manner of the display of religious or cultural items by a tenant.
3. A landlord or an agent or employee of a landlord who is
performing or causing to be performed any maintenance, repair or
replacement of an entry door or doorframe of the dwelling may:
(a) Remove a display of religious or cultural items on the entry
door or doorframe during the time the work is being performed in
accordance with the provisions of this paragraph. A landlord or
an agent or employee of a landlord shall, before temporarily
removing a display of religious or cultural items pursuant to this
paragraph, provide written notice at least 7 days before the work is
performed, except in an emergency, to the tenant. If, following
receipt of such written notice, the tenant consents to the removal
of the display of religious or cultural items or fails, within a
reasonable period, to respond to the written notice, then the
landlord or the agent or employee of the landlord may temporarily
remove the display of religious or cultural items. A landlord or an
agent or employee of a landlord shall store the item or items with
respect and in accordance with the appropriate religious or
cultural practice, tradition or custom and document compliance
with this paragraph. After the work is completed, the landlord or
the agent or employee of the landlord shall return the display of
religious or cultural items to the entry door or doorframe within
72 hours after the work is completed.
(b) Require the tenant to remove a display of religious or
cultural items on the entry door or doorframe during the time the
work is being performed in accordance with the provisions of this
paragraph. A landlord or an agent or employee of a landlord
shall, before requiring a tenant to temporarily remove a display of
religious or cultural items pursuant to this paragraph, provide
written notice at least 7 days before the work is performed, except
in an emergency, to the tenant. After the work is completed, the
tenant must be permitted to return the display of religious or
cultural items to the entry door or doorframe within 72 hours after
the work is completed.
4. In any action commenced to enforce the provisions of this
section, the prevailing party is entitled to recover reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs.
5. As used in this section, “display of religious or cultural
items” means an item displayed or affixed in or on the dwelling
because of sincerely held religious or cultural beliefs, practices or
traditions.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Sec. 1.7. NRS 118A.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
118A.200 1. Any written agreement for the use and
occupancy of a dwelling unit or premises must be signed by the
landlord or his or her agent and the tenant or his or her agent.
2. The landlord shall provide one copy of any written
agreement described in subsection 1 to the tenant free of cost at the
time the agreement is executed and, upon request of the tenant,
provide additional copies of any such agreement to the tenant within
a reasonable time. The landlord may charge a reasonable fee for
providing the additional copies.
3. Any written rental agreement must contain, but is not limited
to, provisions relating to the following subjects:
(a) Duration of the agreement.
(b) Amount of rent and the manner and time of its payment.
(c) Occupancy by children or pets.
(d) Services included with the dwelling rental.
(e) Fees which are required and the purposes for which they are
required.
(f) Deposits which are required and the conditions for their
refund.
(g) Charges which may be required for late or partial payment of
rent or for return of any dishonored check.
(h) Inspection rights of the landlord.
(i) A listing of persons or numbers of persons who are to occupy
the dwelling.
(j) Respective responsibilities of the landlord and the tenant as
to the payment of utility charges.
(k) A signed record of the inventory and condition of the
premises under the exclusive custody and control of the tenant.
(l) A summary of the provisions of NRS 202.470.
(m) Information regarding the procedure pursuant to which a
tenant may report to the appropriate authorities:
(1) A nuisance.
(2) A violation of a building, safety or health code or
regulation.
(n) Information regarding the right of the tenant to engage in the
display of the flag of the United States, as set forth in
NRS 118A.325.
(o) Information regarding the right of the tenant to engage in
the display of religious or cultural items, as set forth in section 1.3
of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
4. In addition to the provisions required by subsection 3, any
written rental agreement for a single-family residence which is not
signed by an authorized agent of the landlord who at the time of
signing holds a permit to engage in property management pursuant
to chapter 645 of NRS must contain a disclosure at the top of the
first page of the agreement, in a font size at least two times larger
than any other font size in the agreement, which states that:
(a) There are rebuttable presumptions in NRS 205.0813 and
205.0817 that the tenant does not have lawful occupancy of the
dwelling unless the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; and
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative; and
(b) The agreement is valid and enforceable against the landlord
and the tenant regardless of whether the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; or
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative.
5. The absence of a written agreement raises a disputable
presumption that:
(a) There are no restrictions on occupancy by children or pets.
(b) Maintenance and waste removal services are provided
without charge to the tenant.
(c) No charges for partial or late payments of rent or for
dishonored checks are paid by the tenant.
(d) Other than normal wear, the premises will be returned in the
same condition as when the tenancy began.
6. It is unlawful for a landlord or any person authorized to
enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf to use any written
agreement which does not conform to the provisions of this section,
and any provision in an agreement which contravenes the provisions
of this section is void.
7. As used in this section, “single-family residence” means a
structure that is comprised of not more than four units. The term
does not include a manufactured home as defined in NRS 118B.015.
Sec. 2. 1. Any provision contained in the governing
documents of an association or in a rental agreement or policy of a
unit’s owner who rents or leases his or her unit or in a rental
agreement or policy of a landlord which is in effect on July 1, 2025,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
and which is contrary to the provisions of this act is void and
unenforceable.
2. Any provision contained in the governing documents of an
association which is contrary to the provisions of this act shall be
deemed, as provided in subsection 1 of NRS 116.1206, to conform
with the provisions of this act by operation of law, and an
association is not required to amend the governing documents to
conform to the provisions of this act.
3. On or before October 1, 2025, each unit’s owner who rents
or leases his or her unit and each landlord shall review and amend
the policies of the unit’s owner or landlord, as applicable, as
necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act.
4. A unit’s owner who rents or leases his or her unit or a
landlord shall review any rental agreement that is in effect on July 1,
2025, to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act. On or
before the date for renewal of such a rental agreement, the unit’s
owner or landlord shall remove any provision of the agreement that
is void and unenforceable pursuant to subsection 1.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Association” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 116.011.
(b) “Executive board” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 116.045.
(c) “Governing documents” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 116.049.
(d) “Landlord” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 118A.100.
(e) “Rental agreement” means an oral or written agreement
between a unit’s owner and another person for the use and
occupancy of a unit or between a landlord and a tenant for the use
and occupancy of a dwelling as defined in NRS 118A.080, as
applicable.
(f) “Unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 116.093.
(g) “Unit’s owner” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 116.095.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)